Utah statutes.
41-3-206.   Duration of licenses -- Expiration date -- Renewal.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), each license issued under this
chapter expires on June 30 of each year and may be renewed upon application
and payment of a fee required under Section 41-3-601, if the license has not
been suspended or revoked.
(2)  A motor vehicle salesperson's license expires as provided under
Subsection (1) or when the salesperson terminates employment with the dealer
with whom he is licensed, whichever comes first.
(3) (a)  Beginning July 1, 1999, the division may not renew a license for a
new or used motor vehicle dealer's license, a new or used motorcycle dealer's
license, or a small trailer dealer's license unless the renewal applicant
completes a three-hour class approved by the division that includes education
on new motor vehicle laws and rules.
(b)  The approved costs of the class shall be paid by the renewal applicant.
(c)  The class shall be completed by the renewal applicant or any designated
representative of the renewal applicant dealer.
(d)  The division shall approve:
(i)  the class providers; and
(ii)  costs of the class.
